Utah statutes.
63K-2-303.   Rules and regulations -- Approval by Legislature.
The board, commission, or agency designated by the governor for carrying out
the provisions of this act is authorized to promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary for effective administration of this act with
approval of the Legislature.
